Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 18. Assets and Liabilities.

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Collateral references. —

44 C.J.S., Insurance, § 238.

Sec. 21.18.010.
Allowable assets.

In a determination of the financial condition of an insurer, the following assets are allowed:

assets that are wholly and exclusively owned by the insurer and that are registered, recorded, or held under the insurer’s name;

premiums, not more than three months past due, excluding commissions payable on them, due from a controlling or controlled person, to the extent that

the premiums collected by the controlling or controlled person and not remitted to the insurer are held in a trust account with a bank or other depository approved by the division and may not be commingled with other money of the controlling or controlled person; a disbursement from the trust account may be made only to the insurer, the insured, or, for the purpose of returning a premium, an entity that is entitled to returned premiums on behalf of the insured; however, the investment income derived from the trust may be allocated as the parties consider proper; a controlling or controlled person shall deposit premiums collected into the trust account within five working days after collection; the director shall disapprove a trust agreement that, in the director’s judgment, does not assure the safety of the premiums collected;

the controlling or controlled person has provided to the insurer, and the insurer has maintained in its possession, an unexpired, clean, irrevocable, and unconditional letter of credit, payable to the insurer, for a term of not less than one year with automatic extension for one year, unless the beneficiary has received in writing notification of intention not to renew 30 days before the original expiration date; the letter of credit must be issued in conformity with the requirements set out in this subparagraph, and the amount of the letter of credit must equal or exceed the liability of the controlling or controlled person to the insurer, at all times during the period that the letter of credit is in effect, for premiums collected by the controlling or controlled person; a letter of credit must be issued under arrangements satisfactory to the division and the letter must be issued by a banking institution that is a member of the Federal Reserve System and that has a financial standing satisfactory to the department; the director shall disapprove a letter of credit that, in the director’s judgment, does not assure the safety of the premiums;

the controlling or controlled person has provided to the insurer, and the insurer has maintained in its possession, evidence that the controlling or controlled person has purchased and has currently in effect a financial guaranty bond, payable to the insurer, issued for a continuous term, cancelable only on 30-day written notice to the beneficiary of intention to terminate with the bond continuing in effect for acts committed before the date of termination, and that is in conformity with the requirements set out in (B) of this paragraph; the amount of the bond must equal or exceed the liability of the controlling or controlled person to the insurer, at all times during which the financial guaranty bond is in effect, for the premium collected by the controlling or controlled person; a financial guaranty bond must be issued under an arrangement satisfactory to the division, by an insurer that is authorized to transact business in the state, that has financial standing satisfactory to the division, and that is neither controlled nor controlling in relation to either the insurer or the person for whom the bond is purchased; and

a financial examination indicates that the controlling or controlled person is solvent and has the ability to pay the premiums as they become due; the financial examination, as scheduled by the director, shall be based on a review of the books and records of the controlling or controlled person;

other assets considered by the director to be available for the payment of losses and claims, at values to be determined by the director, with any excess valuation reported as nonadmitted; and

other assets that do not exceed limitations as given in AS 21.21; any excess shall be reported as nonadmitted assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 21.18.020.
Assets as deductions from liabilities.

Assets may be allowed as deductions from corresponding liabilities, and liabilities may be charged as deductions from assets, and deductions from assets may be charged as liabilities, in accordance with the form of annual statement applicable to the insurer as prescribed by the director, or otherwise in the discretion of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.18.030.
Assets not allowed.

In addition to assets excluded by the application of AS

21.18.010

, all nonadmitted assets and all other assets of doubtful value or character included as ledger or nonledger assets in a statement by an insurer to the director, or in an examiner’s report to the director, shall also be reported, to the extent of the value disallowed, as deductions from the gross assets of the insurer, unless the director permits a reserve to be carried among the liabilities of the insurer in place of a deduction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 21.18.040.
Disallowance of transactions; deceptions.

The director shall disallow as an asset or as a credit against liabilities any reinsurance found by the director, after a hearing, to have been arranged for the purpose principally of deception as to the ceding insurer’s financial condition as of the date of any financial statement of the insurer. Without limiting the general purport of this subsection, reinsurance of a substantial part of the insurer’s outstanding risks contracted for in fact within four months before the date of any financial statement and cancelled in fact within four months after the date of the statement, or reinsurance under which the reinsurer bears no substantial insurance risk or substantial risk of net loss to itself, shall prima facie be considered to have been arranged for the purpose principally of deception within the intent of this subsection.

The director shall disallow as an asset a deposit, fund, or other asset of the insurer determined after a hearing to be

not in good faith the property of the insurer;

not freely subject to withdrawal or liquidation by the insurer at any time for the payment or discharge of claims or other obligations arising under its policies;

the result of arrangements made principally for the purpose of deception as to the insurer’s financial condition as of the date of any financial statement of the insurer.

A disallowance of assets or credits is not valid unless made by the director after a hearing of which notice was given the insurer within six months after the date the financial statement of the insurer in which the deception is claimed was filed with the director.

The director may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of an insurer that has knowingly been a party to a deception or an attempted deception.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For investments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 2.

Sec. 21.18.050.
Reserves and liabilities, in general.

In a determination of the financial condition of an insurer, liabilities to be charged against its assets shall include

the amount, estimated consistent with the provisions of this title, necessary to pay all of its unpaid losses and claims incurred on or before the date of statement, whether reported or unreported, together with the expenses of adjustment or settlement;

with reference to life and health insurance and annuity contracts,

the amount of reserves on life insurance policies and annuity contracts in force, valued according to the tables of mortality, rates of interest, and methods adopted under this title that are applicable;

reserves for disability benefits, for both active and disabled lives;

reserves for accidental death benefits;

additional reserves that may be required by the director, consistent with practice formulated or approved by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, on account of the insurance;

with reference to health insurance, the amount of reserves required under AS

21.18.080

—

21.18.086

;

with reference to insurance other than specified in (2) and (3) of this section, and other than title insurance, the amount of reserves equal to the unearned portions of the gross premiums charged on policies in force, computed in accordance with this chapter;

expenses and other obligations due or accrued at the date of the statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 12 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.18.060.
Unearned premium reserve.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

21.18.070

, an insurer shall maintain an unearned premium reserve on all policies in force against loss or damage to property, including loss or damage under general casualty or surety insurance.

The director may require that the reserves be equal to the unearned portions of the gross premiums in force after deducting applicable reinsurance in solvent insurers as computed on each respective risk from the policy’s date of issue.

An insurer shall compute all of the reserves on a monthly or more frequent pro rata basis.

After adopting a method for computing the reserve, an insurer may not change methods without approval of the supervisory official of the insurer’s state of domicile.

This section does not apply to title insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 24, 25 ch 50 SLA 1990; am §§ 20, 21 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.18.070.
Unearned premium reserve for marine and transportation insurance.

As to marine and transportation insurance, the entire amount of premiums on trip risks not terminated shall be considered unearned and the director may require the insurer to carry a reserve equal to 100 percent of premiums on trip risks written during the month ended as of the date of statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.18.073.
Unearned premium reserve for title insurance.

In addition to an adequate reserve as to outstanding losses as required under AS

21.18.050

, a title insurer shall establish, segregate, and maintain an unearned premium reserve as required by the director.

History.

(§ 26 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 72 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.18.075.
Bail bond reserve.

In place of the unearned premium reserve required on surety bonds under AS

21.18.060

, the department may require a surety insurer or limited surety insurer to set up and maintain a reserve on all bail bonds or other single premium bonds without a definite expiration date, furnished in judicial proceedings, equal to 25 percent of the total consideration charged for the bonds that are outstanding as of the date of a current financial statement of the insurer.

History.

(§ 26 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.18.080.
Reserve standards for health insurance.

The adequacy of health insurance reserves must be determined based on the sum of policy reserves determined under AS

21.18.082

, claim reserves determined under AS

21.18.084

, and premium reserves determined under AS

21.18.086

.

Reserve adequacy must be determined by a prospective gross premium valuation. For policies in force, in a claims status, or in a continuation of benefits status on the valuation date, the gross premium valuation must take into account the present value of all expected benefits unpaid, all expected expenses unpaid, and all unearned or expected premiums, including expected future premium increases.

A gross premium valuation must be performed whenever there is an indication that reserves and future premiums may be insufficient to cover future claims for a particular block of policies or for the entire health insurance block. If a reserve inadequacy is determined to exist, the loss must be immediately recognized and reserves increased to account for the inadequacy. The increased reserves will be considered minimum reserves.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 13 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Sec. 21.18.082.
Policy reserves for health insurance.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, policy reserves are required for all individual and group health insurance policies or groups of policies

with level premiums or with a gross premium pricing structure at time of issue that results in future benefits exceeding the corresponding future valuation net premiums at any time; or

for which gross premiums are restricted by contract, regulation, or another reason that results in future gross premiums, reduced by expenses for administration, commissions, and taxes, being insufficient to cover future claims.

Policy reserves are not required for health insurance policies that cannot be continued after one year from the date of issue.

The structure of valuation net premiums used under a health insurance policy must be consistent with the structure of gross premiums on the date the policy is issued.

For return of premium benefits, deferred cash benefits, policies with premium rates that are not guaranteed, and where the effects of insurer underwriting by policy duration are specifically used in the valuation morbidity standard, termination rates that exceed the mortality rates in the tables required in (g)(2) of this section may be used but may not exceed the lesser of

80 percent of the total termination rate used in the calculation of gross premiums; or

eight percent.

The methods and procedures used to determine health insurance policy reserves must be consistent with the methods and procedures used to determine claim reserves for a health insurance policy.

Negative reserves on a benefit may be offset against positive reserves for other benefits in the same policy, but the total policy reserve with respect to all benefits combined may not be less than zero.

Except as provided in (d) and (h) — (k) of this section, policy reserves for policies issued after July 1, 1997, must be determined based on

a maximum interest rate equal to the maximum interest rate allowed under AS

21.18.110

for the valuation of whole life insurance issued on the same date as the health insurance policy;

a termination assumption equal to the mortality table allowed under AS

21.18.110

for the valuation of whole life insurance issued on the same date as the health insurance policy or equal to a mortality table approved by the director for use in determining the policy reserves;

for long-term care policies issued after July 1, 1997,

a mortality assumption equal to the 1983 Group Annuity Mortality Table without projection;

a lapse assumption for policy durations one through four equal to the lesser of 80 percent of the voluntary lapse rate used in the calculation of gross premiums or eight percent; and

a lapse assumption for policy durations five and later of 100 percent of the voluntary lapse rate used in the calculation of the gross premiums or four percent;

a two-year full preliminary term method under which the terminal reserve is zero on the first and second policy anniversary dates;

a morbidity assumption for

individual disability income insurance issued (i) after December 31, 1997, equal to Tables A or B of the 1985 Commissioners’ Individual Disability Tables for policies; and (ii) before January 1, 1998, equal to the 1964 or 1985 Commissioners’ Individual Disability Tables; the insurer shall indicate which morbidity table the insurer will use for all individual disability income policies issued in a calendar year;

group disability income insurance issued

after December 31, 1997, equal to the 1987 Commissioners’ Group Disability Table; and

before January 1, 1998, equal to the morbidity assumption in use by the insurer before January 1, 1998;

scheduled or fixed time period hospital, surgical, or maternity benefit policies issued

after December 31, 1997, equal to the 1974 Medical Expense Table A from the Transactions of the Society of Actuaries, Volume XXX; and

before January 1, 1998, equal to the morbidity assumption in use by the insurer before January 1, 1998;

cancer expense benefits for policies issued

after December 31, 1997, equal to the 1985 National Association of Insurance Commissioners Cancer Claim Cost Tables; and

before January 1, 1998, equal to the morbidity assumption in use by the insurer before January 1, 1998;

accidental death benefits for policies issued

after December 31, 1997, equal to the 1959 accidental death benefit table; and

before January 1, 1998, equal to the morbidity assumption in use by the insurer before January 1, 1998; or

all other individual or group policy benefits equal to a morbidity table established for reserve determination by an actuary qualified to determine the morbidity table and approved by the director; the morbidity table must contain a pattern of incurred claims cost that reflects the underlying morbidity and may not be constructed for the primary purpose of minimizing reserves.

The reserve method for return of premium or other deferred cash benefits must be a preliminary term method that is applied only in relation to the issue date of the policy and is a

one-year preliminary term method if benefits are provided before the 20th policy anniversary; or

two-year preliminary term method if the benefits are provided only on or after the 20th policy anniversary.

The reserve method for long-term care insurance must be calculated on a

two-year full preliminary term method for a policy or certificate issued on or before July 1, 1997; and

one-year full preliminary term method for a policy or certificate issued after July 1, 1997.

Reserve adjustments due to rate changes, revised assumptions, or other reasons for return of premium or other deferred cash benefits must be applied on the effective date of the adoption of the reserve adjustment.

An alternative method or basis of determining policy reserves may be used if the aggregate policy reserve is not less than the aggregate policy reserves determined under (c) — (j) of this section.

An insurer shall annually review prospective policy liabilities on policies valued by tabular reserves to determine the continuing adequacy and reasonableness of the tabular reserves given future gross premiums. The insurer shall make adjustments to the tabular reserves if the tests indicate that the basis of the reserves is no longer adequate.

Policy reserves that are valued based on the 1964 or 1985 Commissioners Individual Disability Tables must include a provision for a waiver of premium benefit with the minimum reserve for the benefit equal to the valuation net premium to be waived.

Policy reserves for long-term care insurance may not be less than the net single premium for any nonforfeiture benefits provided by the policy or certificate.

History.

(§ 17 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Sec. 21.18.084.
Claim reserves for health insurance.

Claim reserves are required for all incurred and unpaid claims on all health insurance policies.

Claim expense reserves are required for the estimated expense of settlement of all incurred and unpaid claims.

Claim reserves for prior valuation years must be tested for adequacy and reasonableness using claim runoff schedules in accordance with the statutory annual statement, including consideration of any residual unpaid liability. Claim reserve adequacy must be determined in the aggregate.

Claim reserves must be determined as follows:

for policies that require policy reserves under AS

21.18.082(a)

, based on a maximum interest rate equal to the maximum interest rate allowed under AS

21.18.110

for the valuation of whole life insurance issued on the same date as the date the claim was incurred;

for policies that do not require policy reserves under AS

21.18.082(b)

, based on a maximum interest rate equal to the maximum interest rate allowed under AS

21.18.110

for the valuation of single premium immediate annuities issued on the same date as the date the claim was incurred less 100 basis points;

except as provided in (4) and (5) of this subsection, a morbidity assumption for

individual disability income insurance must be equal to the morbidity assumption used in determining policy reserves under AS

21.18.082(g)(5)

;

group disability income insurance for policies issued

after December 31, 1997, must be equal to the 1987 Commissioners Group Disability Table; and

before January 1, 1998, must be equal to the morbidity assumption in use by the insurer before January 1, 1998;

accidental death benefits must be equal to the actual amount of claims incurred; and

all other individual or group policy benefits must be equal to a morbidity table approved by the director and established for reserve determination by an actuary qualified to determine the morbidity table;

for individual or group disability claims with a duration from disablement of less than two years, morbidity assumptions may be based on the insurer’s experience if determined credible by the insurer or upon another basis designed to place a sound value on the liabilities as determined by the insurer;

if approved by the director, reserves for group disability income claims with a duration from disablement of more than two years but less than five years may be based on the insurer’s experience for which the insurer maintains control of underwriting and claim administration; request for approval to use this modified reserve basis must include

an analysis of the credibility of the experience;

a description of how all the insurer’s experience is proposed to be used in setting the reserves;

a description and quantification of the margins to be included;

a summary of the financial impact that the proposed plan of modification would have on the insurer’s last filed annual statement;

a copy of the approval from the state of domicile; and

all other information requested by the director;

any generally accepted actuarial reserving method or other reasonable method approved by the director may be used; the method used to estimate liabilities may be an aggregate method; approximations based on groupings and averages may also be used.

Claim reserves that are valued based on the 1964 or 1985 Commissioners’ Individual Disability Tables must include a provision for a waiver of premium benefit with the minimum reserve for the benefit equal to the valuation net premium to be waived.

History.

(§ 17 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Sec. 21.18.086.
Premium reserves for health insurance.

Unearned premium reserves must be established for the period of coverage for which premiums, other than premiums paid in advance, have been paid beyond the date of valuation.

Due and unpaid premiums that are carried as an asset in the annual statement must be treated as premiums in force and are subject to the unearned premium reserve requirements of this section. Unpaid commissions, premium taxes, and costs of collection associated with due and unpaid premiums must be carried in the annual statement as an offsetting liability.

Gross premiums paid in advance for a period of coverage starting after the next premium due date following the valuation date may be discounted to the valuation date and must be held as a separate liability in the annual statement or as an addition to the unearned premium reserve established in this section.

The minimum unearned premium reserve for a policy is the pro rata unearned modal premium that applies to the valuation period beyond the date of valuation. If a policy reserve is required for a policy, the unearned modal premium is the valuation net modal premium on the policy reserve. If no policy reserve is required for a policy, the unearned modal premium is the gross modal premium for the policy.

The sum of the unearned premium and policy reserves for all policies may not be less than the gross modal unearned premium reserve on all policies as of the date of valuation. The total unearned premium and policy reserves may not be less than the expected claims for the period after the valuation date represented by the unearned premium reserve.

An insurer may use approximations and estimates in determining premium reserves, including groupings, averages, and aggregate estimates. The approximations or estimates must be tested periodically and not less frequently than triennially to determine adequacy.

Premium reserves based on the 1964 or 1985 Commissioners’ Individual Disability Tables must include policies on premium waiver as in-force contracts and establish a minimum reserve for a waiver of premium benefit equal to the unearned modal valuation net premium being waived.

History.

(§ 17 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

Sec. 21.18.090.
Loss reserves, liability insurance, and workers’ compensation. [Repealed, § 53 ch 96 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 21.18.100.
Increase of reserves.

If loss experience shows that an insurer’s loss reserves or reserves for incurred but not reported losses, however computed or estimated, are inadequate, the director shall require the insurer to maintain loss reserves or reserves for incurred but not reported losses in the increased amount needed to make them adequate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 23 ch 67 SLA 1992)